Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 4. Alcohol Server Training Program

§ 12-2-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Department” means the department of revenue;

“Program” means an alcohol server training program and examination administered to servers by providers under the provisions of this article;

“Provider” means an individual, independent contractor, partnership, corporation, public or private school or any other legal entity certified by the department to provide an alcohol server training program authorized by this article;

“Server” means a person who physically serves or delivers alcoholic liquor at retail on or off the premises of a business licensed by a local licensing authority under this title.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 149, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 12-2-402.
Powers and duties of the department.

Not later than December 31, 2003, the department shall promulgate rules establishing an alcohol server training program to train servers to help promote safe and responsible consumption of alcoholic liquor.

The rules shall provide for the certification of providers who shall use curricula developed by the department. The department shall promulgate rules governing the manner in which providers make available program courses and examinations to servers.

The department may suspend, revoke or not renew any certification issued to a provider if, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the department finds the provider has violated this article or any rule promulgated under this article.

The department may cooperate and enter into agreements with the department of health to implement the purposes of this section. The agreements may provide for the expenditure of funds appropriated to the department of health which are not otherwise restricted.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 149, § 1.